ko: 어쿠스틱 기타 바디 형태: 000(트리플 오); 오디토리엄; 클래식(나일론 줄); 콘서트; 드레드넛; 그랜드 오디토리엄; 그랜드 콘서트; 점보; 미니 점보; 오케스트라 모델(OM); 팔러; 리조네이터; 트래블; 기타
da: Akustisk guitars form: 000 (triple-ought); Auditorium; Klassisk (nylonstrenge); Koncert; Dreadnought; Grand auditorium; Grand concert; Jumbo; Mini jumbo; Orchestra-model (OM); Parlor; Resonator; Rejse; Anden
fr: Forme du corps de la guitare acoustique: 000 (triple 0); Auditorium; Classique (cordes en nylon); Concert; Dreadnought; Grand auditorium; Grand concert; Jumbo; Mini jumbo; Modèle d’orchestre (OM); Parlor; Résonateur; Voyage; Autre
sk-SK: Tvar tela akustickej gitary: 000 (Triple-Ought); Auditorium; Klasická (nylonové struny); Concert; Dreadnought; Grand Auditorium; Grand Concert; Jumbo; Mini Jumbo; Orchestra model (OM); Parlor; Rezonátor; Cestovná; Iné
hr-HR: Oblik tijela akustične gitare: 000 (triple-ought); Auditorium; Klasična (najlonske žice); Koncertna; Dreadnought; Grand auditorium; Grand concert; Jumbo; Mini jumbo; Orchestra model (OM); Parlor; Rezonatorska; Putna; Ostalo
vi: Hình dạng thân đàn guitar acoustic: 000 (triple-ought); Auditorium; Cổ điển (dây nylon); Concert; Dreadnought; Grand auditorium; Grand concert; Jumbo; Mini jumbo; Kiểu dàn nhạc (OM); Parlor; Resonator; Du lịch; Khác
it: Shapes del corpo della chitarra acustica: 000 (triple-ought); Auditorium; Classica (corde in nylon); Concerto; Dreadnought; Grand Auditorium; Grand Concert; Jumbo; Mini Jumbo; Orchestra model (OM); Parlor; Resonatore; Da viaggio; Altro
pl: Kształt korpusu gitary akustycznej: 000 (triple-ought); Auditorium; Klasyczna (struny nylonowe); Concert; Dreadnought; Grand auditorium; Grand concert; Jumbo; Mini jumbo; Orchestra model (OM); Parlor; Rezonator; Podróżna; Inne
lt-LT: Akustinės gitaros korpuso forma: 000 („triple-ought“); „Auditorium“; Klasikinė (su nailoninėmis stygomis); Koncertinė; „Dreadnought“; „Grand auditorium“; „Grand concert“; „Jumbo“; „Mini jumbo“; Orkestrinis modelis (OM); „Parlor“; Rezonatorinė; Kelioninė; Kita
pt-BR: Forma do corpo de violão: 000 (triple-ought); Auditorium; Clássico (cordas de nylon); Concert; Dreadnought; Grand Auditorium; Grand Concert; Jumbo; Mini Jumbo; Orchestra Model (OM); Parlor; Resonador; Viagem; Outros
sv: Akustisk gitarr – kroppsform: 000 (triple-ought); Auditorium; Klassisk (nylonsträngad); Concert; Dreadnought; Grand auditorium; Grand concert; Jumbo; Mini jumbo; Orchestra model (OM); Parlor; Resonator; Resemodell; Övrigt
th: รูปทรงกีตาร์โปร่ง: 000 (Triple-ought); Auditorium; คลาสสิก (สายไนลอน); Concert; Dreadnought; Grand auditorium; Grand concert; Jumbo; Mini jumbo; Orchestra model (OM); Parlor; Resonator; Travel; อื่นๆ
en: Acoustic guitar body shape: 000 (triple-ought); Auditorium; Classical (nylon-string); Concert; Dreadnought; Grand auditorium; Grand concert; Jumbo; Mini jumbo; Orchestra model (OM); Parlor; Resonator; Travel; Other
el: Σχήμα σώματος ακουστικής κιθάρας: 000 (triple-ought); Auditorium; Κλασική (νάιλον χορδές); Concert; Dreadnought; Grand auditorium; Grand concert; Jumbo; Mini jumbo; Orchestra model (OM); Parlor; Resonator; Ταξιδιού; Άλλο
es: Forma del cuerpo de la guitarra acústica: 000 (triple cero); Auditorio; Clásica (cuerdas de nailon); Concierto; Dreadnought; Gran auditorio; Gran concierto; Jumbo; Mini jumbo; Modelo orquesta (OM); Parlor; Resonador; De viaje; Otro
ja: アコースティックギターのボディ形状: 000 (トリプルオー); オーディトリアム; クラシック (ナイロン弦); コンサート; ドレッドノート; グランドオーディトリアム; グランドコンサート; ジャンボ; ミニジャンボ; オーケストラモデル (OM); パーラー; リゾネーター; トラベル; その他
sl-SI: Oblika telesa akustične kitare: 000 (triple-ought); Auditorium; Klasična (najlonske strune); Concert; Dreadnought; Grand auditorium; Grand concert; Jumbo; Mini jumbo; Orchestra model (OM); Parlor; Resonatorska; Potovalna; Drugo
fi: Akustisen kitaran rungon muoto: 000 (triple-ought); Auditorium; Klassinen (nailonkielinen); Concert; Dreadnought; Grand auditorium; Grand concert; Jumbo; Mini jumbo; Orchestra-malli (OM); Parlor; Resonaattori; Matka; Muu
de: Form des Akustikgitarrenkorpus: 000 (Triple-Ought); Auditorium; Konzertgitarre (Nylonsaiten); Concert; Dreadnought; Grand Auditorium; Grand Concert; Jumbo; Mini-Jumbo; Orchestra Model (OM); Parlor; Resonator; Travel; Andere
hu: Akusztikus gitártest formája: 000 (triple-ought); Auditorium; Klasszikus (nylonhúros); Koncert; Dreadnought; Grand auditorium; Grand concert; Jumbo; Mini jumbo; Zenekari modell (OM); Parlor; Rezonátoros; Utazó; Egyéb
nb: Shapespå akustiske gitarer: 000 (triple-ought); Auditorium; Klassisk (nylonstreng); Konsert; Dreadnought; Grand auditorium; Grand concert; Jumbo; Mini-jumbo; Orkestermodell (OM); Parlor; Resonator; Reise; Annet
cs: Tvar korpusu akustické kytary: 000 (Triple O); Auditorium; Klasická (nylonové struny); Concert; Dreadnought; Grand Auditorium; Grand Concert; Jumbo; Mini Jumbo; Orchestra (OM); Parlor; Rezonátor; Cestovní; Ostatní
pt-PT: Formato do corpo da guitarra acústica: 000 (triple-ought); Auditorium; Clássica (cordas de nylon); Concert; Dreadnought; Grand auditorium; Grand concert; Jumbo; Mini jumbo; Modelo orquestra (OM); Parlor; Ressonador; Viagem; Outro
nl: Vorm van de akoestische gitaar: 000 (triple-ought); Auditorium; Klassiek (nylon snaren); Concert; Dreadnought; Grand auditorium; Grand concert; Jumbo; Mini-jumbo; Orkestmodel (OM); Parlor; Resonator; Reis; Overig
tr: Akustik gitar gövde şekli: 000 (Triple-Ought); Auditorium; Klasik (naylon telli); Concert; Dreadnought; Grand Auditorium; Grand Concert; Jumbo; Mini Jumbo; Orchestra Model (OM); Parlor; Rezonatör; Seyahat; Diğer
ro-RO: Forma corpului chitarei acustice: 000 (triple-ought); Auditorium; Clasică (corzi de nailon); Concert; Dreadnought; Grand auditorium; Grand concert; Jumbo; Mini jumbo; Model de orchestră (OM); Parlor; Rezonator; De călătorie; Altele
ru: Форма корпуса акустической гитары: 000 (Triple-Ought); Аудиториум; Классическая (с нейлоновыми струнами); Концертная; Дредноут; Гранд аудиториум; Гранд концерт; Джамбо; Мини-джамбо; Оркестровая модель (OM); Парлор; Резонаторная; Трэвел; Другое
zh-CN: 原声吉他琴体形状: 000（三零）; Auditorium; 古典（尼龙弦）; Concert; Dreadnought; Grand Auditorium; Grand Concert; Jumbo; Mini Jumbo; Orchestra Model (OM); Parlor; 共鸣器; 旅行; 其他
bg-BG: Форма на тялото на акустична китара: 000 (triple-ought); Аудиториум; Класическа (с найлонови струни); Концерт; Дредноут; Гранд аудиториум; Гранд концерт; Джъмбо; Мини джъмбо; Оркестров модел (OM); Парлор; Резонаторна; Травел; Други
zh-TW: 原聲吉他琴身形狀: 000 (Triple-Ought); Auditorium; 古典 (尼龍弦); Concert; Dreadnought; Grand Auditorium; Grand Concert; Jumbo; Mini Jumbo; Orchestra Model (OM); Parlor; 共鳴器; 旅行吉他; 其他